Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2590.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 6, 1951 (P.L.69, No.20), known as The Landlord and Tenant Act of 1951, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 207. Internet Bulk Pricing.--(a) A landlord may obtain a shared Internet subscription for tenants from a third-party Internet service provider to provide service for wired Internet, cellular or satellite service and may charge tenants by using a ratio utility billing system.(b) If a landlord obtains a shared Internet subscription for Internet services under subsection (a), the landlord may recover only the charges imposed on the landlord by the Internet 1234567891011121314151617181920 provider.(c) If provided in the rental agreement, the landlord may impose a ratio utility billing system for a shared Internet subscription during the term of a rental agreement if the landlord provides notice under subsection (d).(d) If a landlord uses a ratio utility billing system method under subsection (a), the rental agreement shall contain a specific description of the ratio utility billing method used to allocate Internet costs. For any existing tenants, the landlord shall provide at least 90 days notice to the tenant before the landlord begins allocating costs through a ratio utility billing system.(e) A landlord shall allow all tenants to opt out of paying for any shared subscription from a third-party Internet service provider to provide service for wired Internet, cellular or satellite service that is offered in connection with the tenancy.(f) The rental agreement shall contain a disclosure that lists the Internet service and the associated charge, which a landlord may not exceed. If a landlord is not in compliance with subsection (b), a tenant may first object in writing to the landlord regarding the Internet billing. If the dispute is not resolved within 30 days of the landlord's receipt of the written objection, the tenant may bring a civil action to enforce this section. A landlord may not retaliate against a tenant for opting out under this section. If the landlord or their agent violates subsection (d), the tenant may deduct the cost of the subscription to the third-party Internet service provider from the rent for 90 days following the imposition of the ratio utility billing system for a shared Internet subscription.20260HB2590PN3499 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (g) As used in this section, the term "ratio utility billing system" means a system used to split a building or shared utility bills of a complex among tenants when individual meters do not exist for each unit in the building or complex.Section 2. The addition of section 207 of the act shall apply to leases entered into on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2590PN3499 - 3 - 12345678